Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-336
Abortion by other than accepted medical procedures; penalty.

The performing of an abortion by using anything other than accepted medical procedures is a Class IV felony.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 51.